District of Columbia statutes.
1-1163.27

Duration of a transition committee; restriction on formation.

(a)

A transition committee shall terminate no later than 45 days from the beginning of the term of the new Mayor or Chairman, except that the transition committee may continue to accept contributions necessary to retire the debts of the committee.

(b)

Notwithstanding this part, no transition committee may be organized if an appropriation pursuant to § 1-204.46 has been approved.

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 327, 59 DCR 1862

History